Georgia, session 2025_26, HB523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 36 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
annexation pursuant to application by 100 percent of landowners, is amended by revising
Code Section 36-36-21, relating to annexation upon application of all land owners, filing of
identification of annexed property with Department of Community Affairs and county
governing authority, and effect of annexation, as follows:
"36-36-21.
Authority is granted to the governing bodies of the several municipal corporations of this
state to annex to the existing corporate limits thereof unincorporated areas contiguous to
the existing corporate limits at the time of such annexation, in accordance with the
H. B. 523
- 1 -

LC 47 3312
procedures provided in this article and in Article 1 of this chapter, upon the written and
signed applications of all of the owners of all of the land, except the owners of any public
street, road, highway, or right of way, proposed to be annexed, containing a complete
description of the lands to be annexed. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
chapter to the contrary, any proposed annexation pursuant to this article is contingent upon
the adoption of a resolution by the governing authority of the county in which such
property is located consenting to such annexation. Lands to be annexed at any one time
shall be treated as one body, regardless of the number of owners, and all parts shall be
considered as adjoining the limits of the municipal corporation when any one part of the
entire body abuts such limits. When such application is acted upon by the municipal
authorities and the land is, by ordinance, annexed to the municipal corporation, an
identification of the property so annexed shall be filed with the Department of Community
Affairs and with the governing authority of the county in which the property is located in
accordance with Code Section 36-36-3. When so annexed, such lands shall constitute a
part of the lands within the corporate limits of the municipal corporation as completely and
fully as if the limits had been marked and defined by local Act of the General Assembly.
Except as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 36-36-20, nothing in this article shall
be construed to authorize annexation of the length of any public right of way except to the
extent that such right of way adjoins private property otherwise annexed by the municipal
corporation."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 523
- 2 -